Utah statutes.
17C-1-302.   Agency property exempt from levy and execution sale -- Judgment against community or agency.

(1) (a)  All agency property, including funds the agency owns or holds for purposes of this title, is exempt from levy and execution sale, and no execution or judicial process may issue against agency property.  A judgment against an agency may not be a charge or lien upon agency property.

(b)  Subsection (1)(a) does not apply to or limit the right of obligees to pursue any remedies for the enforcement of any pledge or lien given by an agency on its funds or revenues.

(2)  A judgment against the community that created the agency may not be a charge or lien upon agency property.

(3)  A judgment against an agency may not be a charge or lien upon property of the community that created the agency.

